cs: Vlastnosti převodníku zvuku/skenování: S umělou inteligencí; Analogová podpora; Automatická konverze; Automatická kalibrace obrazu; Podpora symetrického signálu; Smyčka s bufferem; Digitální podpora; Převod snímkové frekvence; Ovládání zmrazení obrazu; Ovládání zoomu; Interní generátor barevných pruhů; Funkce paměti; Dálkové ovládání; Bezpečnostní zámek; Podpora nesymetyrického signálu; Vertikální filtrování; Jiné
th: คุณลักษณะตัวแปลงเสียง/รูปแบบสัญญาณ: ขับเคลื่อนด้วย AI; รองรับระบบอนาล็อก; การแปลงอัตโนมัติ; การปรับเทียบภาพอัตโนมัติ; รองรับเสียงในระบบ Balanced; สัญญาณขาออกแบบบัฟเฟอร์; รองรับระบบดิจิทัล; การแปลงอัตราเฟรม; การควบคุมภาพค้าง; การควบคุมการซูมภาพ; เครื่องกำเนิดแถบสีภายใน; ฟังก์ชันหน่วยความจำ; รีโมตควบคุม; การล็อคความปลอดภัย; รองรับเสียงในระบบ Unbalanced; ระบบกรองสัญญาณแนวตั้ง; อื่นๆ
es: Características del convertidor de audio/escaneo: Con tecnología de IA; Compatibilidad analógica; Conversión automática; Calibración automática de imagen; Compatible con audio equilibrado; Bucle almacenado en búfer; Compatibilidad digital; Conversión de velocidad de fotogramas; Control de congelación de imagen; Control del zoom de imagen; Generador de barras de colores interno; Función de memoria; Control remoto; Bloqueo de seguridad; Compatible con audio no equilibrado; Filtrado vertical; Otros
de: Funktionen des Audio/Scan-Konverters: KI-gestützt; Analoge Unterstützung; Automatische Konvertierung; Automatische Bildkalibrierung; Balanced-Audio-Unterstützung; Gepufferter Loop-through; Digitale Unterstützung; Frameratenkonvertierung; Bildeinfrier-Steuerung; Bildzoom-Steuerung; Interner Farbbalkengenerator; Speicherfunktion; Fernsteuerung; Sicherheitssperre; Unsymmetrische Audiounterstützung; Vertikale Filterung; Sonstiges
vi: Tính năng chuyển đổi âm thanh/quét: Hỗ trợ bởi AI; Hỗ trợ tương tự; Chuyển đổi tự động; Hiệu chỉnh hình ảnh tự động; Hỗ trợ âm thanh cân bằng; Vòng lặp được đệm; Hỗ trợ kỹ thuật số; Chuyển đổi tốc độ khung hình; Kiểm soát đóng băng hình ảnh; Điều khiển thu phóng hình ảnh; Trình tạo thanh màu bên trong; Chức năng bộ nhớ; Điều khiển từ xa; Khóa an ninh; Hỗ trợ âm thanh không cân bằng; Lọc đứng; Khác
ro-RO: Caracteristici convertor audio/scanare: Pe bază de AI; Suport analogic; Conversie automată; Calibrare automată a imaginii; Suport audio echilibrat; Buclă tampon; Suport digital; Conversie rată de cadre; Control blocare imagine; Control zoom imagine; Generator intern de bare de culoare; Funcția de memorare; Telecomandă; Protocol de securitate; Suport audio neechilibrat; Filtrare verticală; Altele
ru: Функции преобразователя аудиосигнала или преобразователя развертки: На базе ИИ; Аналоговая поддержка; Автоматическое преобразование; Автоматическая калибровка изображения; Поддержка сбалансированного звука; Буферизованный проходной вход; Цифровая поддержка; Конвертация кадровой частоты; Управление заморозкой изображения; Управление масштабированием изображения; Внутренний генератор цветных полос; Функция памяти; Дистанционное управление; Блокировка несанкционированного доступа; Поддержка несбалансированного звука; Вертикальная фильтрация; Другое
nl: Audio/Scan converter functies: AI-aangedreven; Analoge ondersteuning; Automatische conversie; Automatische beeldkalibratie; Gebalanceerde audio-ondersteuning; Gebufferde doorlus; Digitale ondersteuning; Conversie van framesnelheid; Controle van beeldbevriezing; Controle van zoomregeling; Interne kleurenbalkgenerator; Geheugenfunctie; Afstandsbediening; Beveiligingsuitsluiting; Niet gebalanceerde audio-ondersteuning; Verticaal filteren; Andere
ja: オーディオ/スキャンコンバータの機能: AI搭載; アナログサポート; 自動変換; 自動画像補正; バランスオーディオサポート; バッファ付きループスルー; デジタルサポート; フレームレート変換; 画像フリーズコントロール; 画像ズームコントロール; 内部カラーバージェネレーター; メモリ機能; リモコン; セキュリティロックアウト; アンバランスオーディオサポート; 垂直フィルタリング; その他
fr: Caractéristiques du convertisseur audio/scanner: Doté d’une IA; Prise en charge analogique; Conversion automatique; Calibrage automatique des images; Prise en charge de l’audio symétrique; Boucle tampon; Prise en charge numérique; Conversion de fréquence d’images; Contrôle du gel de l’image; Contrôle du zoom de l’image; Générateur interne de barres de couleurs; Fonction mémoire; Télécommande; Verrouillage de sécurité; Prise en charge de l’audio asymétrique; Filtrage vertical; Autre
sv: Detaljer för ljud- och skanningskonverterare: AI-driven; Analogt stöd; Automatisk konvertering; Automatisk bildkalibrering; Balanserat ljudstöd; Buffrad genomgång; Digitalt stöd; Konvertering av bildfrekvens; Bildfrysningskontroll; Bildzoomkontroll; Intern färgfältgenerator; Minnesfunktion; Fjärrkontroll; Säkerhetslåsning; Stöd för obalanserat ljud; Vertikal filtrering; Övrigt
el: Λειτουργίες μετατροπέα ήχου/σάρωσης: Με τεχνολογία ΑΙ; Αναλογική υποστήριξη; Αυτόματη μετατροπή; Αυτόματη βαθμονόμηση εικόνας; Υποστήριξη ισορροπημένου ήχου; Ενδιάμεσος βρόχος σε προσωρινή μνήμη; Ψηφιακή υποστήριξη; Μετατροπή ρυθμού πλαισίων; Έλεγχος παγώματος εικόνας; Έλεγχος εστίασης εικόνας; Εσωτερική γεννήτρια ραβδώσεων χρώματος; Λειτουργία μνήμης; Τηλεχειρισμός; Κλείδωμα ασφαλείας; Υποστήριξη μη ισορροπημένου ήχου; Κάθετα φίλτρα; Άλλο
bg-BG: Функции на конвертора за аудио/сканиране: Задвижван от AI; Аналогова поддръжка; Автоматично преобразуване; Автоматично калибриране на изображението; Балансирана аудио поддръжка; Буферирано преминаване; Цифрова поддръжка; Преобразуване на честотата на кадрите; Контрол на замръзването на изображението; Управление на мащаба на изображението; Вътрешен генератор на цветни ленти; Функция памет; Дистанционно управление; Защитно заключване; Поддръжка на небалансирано аудио; Вертикално филтриране; Други
hr-HR: Značajke audio pretvarača / pretvarača signala: Pokreće umjetna inteligencija; Analogna podrška; Automatska konverzija; Automatska kalibracija slike; Podržavanje uravnoteženog zvuka; Prolaz kroz međuspremnik; Digitalna podrška; Stopa konverzije kadrova; Kontrola zamrzavanja slike; Kontrola zumiranja slike; Unutarnji generator trake boja; Memorijska funkcija; Upravljanje na daljinu; Sigurnosno zaključavanje; Podržavanje neuravnoteženog zvuka; Vertikalno filtriranje; Ostalo
fi: Audio/Scan-muuntimen ominaisuudet: Tekoälyllä toimiva; Analoginen tuki; Automaattinen muunnos; Automaattinen kuvan kalibrointi; Tasapainotettu audiotuki; Puskuroitu silmukan läpivienti; Digitaalinen tuki; Kuvanopeuden muunnos; Kuvan pysäytyksen hallinta; Kuvan zoomauksen hallinta; Sisäinen väripalkkigeneraattori; Muistitoiminto; Kauko-ohjain; Turvalukitus; Epätasapainoinen audiotuki; Pystysuora suodatus; Muu
it: Funzionalità del convertitore audio/scansione: Alimentato dall'intelligenza artificiale; Supporto analogico; Conversione automatica; Calibrazione automatica dell'immagine; Supporto audio bilanciato; Loop-through bufferizzato; Supporto digitale; Conversione del frame rate; Controllo del fermo immagine; Controllo dello zoom dell'immagine; Generatore di barre di colore interno; Funzione di memoria; Telecomando; Blocco di sicurezza; Supporto audio sbilanciato; Filtraggio verticale; Altro
nb: Lyd-/skannekonverteringsfunksjoner: KI-drevet; Analog støtte; Automatisk konvertering/veksling; Automatisk bildekalibrering; Balansert lydstøtte; Bufret gjennomsløyfing; Digital støtte; Konvertering av bildefrekvens; Kontroll for frysing av bilder; Kontroll for zoom av bilder; Intern fargelinjegenerator; Minnefunksjon; Fjernkontroll; Sikkerhetssperre; Ubalansert lydstøtte; Vertikal filtrering; Annet
sl-SI: Funkcije pretvornika zvoka/pretvornika PC-TV: Poganja UI; Analogna podpora; Samodejna pretvorba; Samodejna kalibracija slike; Uravnotežena zvočna podpora; Prehod brez izgube; Digitalna podpora; Pretvorba hitrosti sličic; Nadzor zamrznitve slike; Nadzor povečave slike; Notranji generator barvnih vrstic; Pomnilniška funkcija; Daljinsko upravljanje; Varnostna blokada; Neuravnotežena zvočna podpora; Navpično filtriranje; Drugo
pl: Charakterystyka konwertera audio/skanującego: Obsługiwany przez sztuczną inteligencję; Obsługa sygnałów analogowych; Automatyczna konwersja; Automatyczna kalibracja obrazu; Zbalansowana obsługa dźwięku; Buforowane przekazywanie sygnałów; Obsługa sygnałów cyfrowych; Konwersja liczby klatek na sekundę; Kontrola zamrażania obrazu; Sterowanie powiększeniem obrazu; Wewnętrzny generator pasków kontroli koloru; Funkcja pamięci; Zdalne sterowanie; Blokada bezpieczeństwa; Niezbalansowana obsługa dźwięku; Filtrowanie pionowe; Inne
zh-CN: 音频/扫描转换功能: AI 赋能; 模拟支持; 自动转换; 自动图像校准; 支持平衡音频; 缓冲环通; 数字支持; 帧率转换; 图像冻结控制; 图像缩放控制; 内部彩条信号发生器; 记忆功能; 远程控制; 安全锁定; 支持非平衡音频; 垂直滤波; 其他
lt-LT: Garso / nuskaitymo keitiklio funkcijos: Veikia DI pagrindu; Analoginis palaikymas; Automatinis konvertavimas; Automatinis vaizdo kalibravimas; Subalansuotas garso palaikymas; Buferinė kilpa; Skaitmeninis palaikymas; Kadrų dažnio konvertavimas; Vaizdo sustabdymo valdymas; Vaizdo priartinimo valdymas; Vidinės spalvų juostos generatorius; Atminties funkcija; Nuotolinis valdymas; Apsaugos užraktas; Nesubalansuotas garso palaikymas; Vertikalus filtravimas; Kita
hu: Hang-/Szkenkonverter funkciói: AI-alapú; Analóg jelfeldolgozás támogatása; Automatikus átalakítás; Automatikus képkalibrálás; Kiegyensúlyozott hangzás támogatása; Pufferelt hurokátvezetés; Digitális támogatás; Képkockasebesség átalakítása; Képrögzítés vezérlése; Képnagyítás vezérlése; Belső színsávgenerátor; Memória funkció; Távvezérlés; Biztonsági zárolás; Kiegyensúlyozatlan hangzás támogatása; Függőleges szűrés; Egyéb
zh-TW: 音訊/掃描轉換器功能: AI 驅動; 類比支援; 自動轉換; 自動影像校準; 平衡音訊支援; 緩衝循環; 數位支援; 影格率轉換; 影像凍結控制; 影像變焦控制; 內部色條產生器; 記憶功能; 遠端控制; 安全鎖定; 不平衡音訊支援; 垂直過濾; 其他
pt-PT: Características do conversor de áudio/scan: Alimentado por IA; Suporte analógico; Conversão automática; Calibração automática de imagem; Suporte de áudio equilibrado; Loop-through com buffer; Suporte digital; Conversão de taxa de fotogramas; Controlo de congelamento de imagem; Controlo de zoom de imagem; Gerador interno de barra de cores; Função de memória; Controlo remoto; Bloqueio de segurança; Suporte de áudio não equilibrado; Filtragem vertical; Outro
en: Audio/Scan converter features: AI-powered; Analog support; Automatic conversion; Automatic image calibration; Balanced audio support; Buffered loop-through; Digital support; Frame rate conversion; Image freeze control; Image zoom control; Internal color bar generator; Memory function; Remote control; Security lockout; Unbalanced audio support; Vertical filtering; Other
da: Funktioner for lyd-/scanningskonverter: AI-drevet; Analog support; Automatisk konvertering; Automatisk billedkalibrering; Afbalanceret lydsupport; Buffered loop-through; Digital support; Konvertering af billedfrekvens; Billedfrysningskontrol; Billedzoomkontrol; Intern farvebjælkegenerator; Hukommelsesfunktion; Fjernbetjening; Sikkerhedslockout; Ikke-afbalanceret lydsupport; Lodret filtrering; Andet
tr: Ses/Tarama dönüştürücü özellikleri: Yapay zeka destekli; Analog destek; Otomatik dönüştürme; Otomatik görüntü kalibrasyonu; Dengeli ses desteği; Arabellekli döngü geçişi; Dijital destek; Kare hızı dönüştürme; Görüntü dondurma kontrolü; Görüntü yakınlaştırma kontrolü; Dahili renk çubuğu oluşturucu; Hafıza fonksiyonu; Uzaktan kumanda; Güvenlik kilidi; Dengesiz ses desteği; Dikey filtreleme; Diğer
sk-SK: Funkcie prevodníka zvuku/skenovania: Podporované umelou inteligenciou; Analógová podpora; Automatická konverzia; Automatická kalibrácia obrazu; Vyvážená podpora zvuku; Priebežná vyrovnávacia pamäť; Digitálna podpora; Konverzia snímkovej frekvencie; Ovládanie zmrazenia obrazu; Ovládanie priblíženia obrazu; Interný generátor farebných pruhov; Funkcia pamäte; Diaľkové ovládanie; Bezpečnostné uzamknutie; Nevyvážená podpora zvuku; Vertikálne filtrovanie; Iné
ko: 오디오/스캔 변환기 기능: AI 기반; 아날로그 지원; 자동 변환; 자동 이미지 보정; 밸런스드 오디오 지원; 버퍼링 루프스루; 디지털 지원; 프레임 속도 변환; 이미지 정지 제어; 이미지 줌 컨트롤; 내부 컬러바 생성기; 메모리 기능; 원격 제어; 보안 잠금; 언밸런스드 오디오 지원; 수직 필터링; 기타
pt-BR: Recursos do conversor de áudio/leitura: Com IA; Suporte analógico; Conversão automática; Calibração automática de imagem; Suporte de áudio balanceado; Loop-through com buffer; Suporte digital; Conversão de taxa de quadros; Controle de congelamento de imagem; Controle de zoom de imagem; Gerador de barra de cores interna; Função de memória; Controle remoto; Bloqueio de segurança; Suporte a áudio não balanceado; Filtragem vertical; Outro